Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 2

Inspection, Control, and Supervision Fee

65-3-201. General provisions.

Every railroad which is doing business in this state and subject to the control and jurisdiction of the department of transportation and to which this chapter applies, shall pay to the state on or before July 1 of each year, a fee for the inspection, control and supervision of the business, service and rates of such railroads.

The fee prescribed by this section shall be paid by railroads in addition to any and all property, franchise, license and other taxes, fees and charges fixed, assessed or charged by law against the railroads.

The amount of the fee prescribed by this section shall be assessed against the actual ton miles operated annually by each railroad in this state, but no fee shall be assessed against any ton miles operated in excess of the maximum assessable ton miles for each railroad. The maximum assessable ton miles shall be the total ton miles reported to the former public service commission by each railroad in calendar year 1990, plus four percent (4%) of that base amount for each calendar year thereafter. The fee fixed and assessed against these ton miles to be paid by each railroad is four cents (4¢) per one thousand (1,000) ton miles. This fee is effective on payments made to the former public service commission on or before July 1, 1995, based upon ton miles for the calendar year 1995, and in each year thereafter.

In no case shall the fee to be paid be less than one hundred dollars ($100) which will be the minimum inspection, control and supervision fee to be paid by any railroad subject to such fee.

Acts 1970, ch. 599, § 1(1-4); T.C.A., § 65-332; Acts 1986, ch. 862, § 4; 1988, ch. 582, § 1; 1991, ch. 271, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 10; 1995, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 646, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The former public service commission, referred to in (c), was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 305. Authority under this chapter was transferred from the commission to the department of transportation, effective July 1, 1995.

Cross-References. Petitions to be in writing, filing fee, § 65-2-103.

Powers and construction of railroads, title 65, ch. 6.

Prohibition of gas storage tanks within two hundred feet of a railroad, § 68-101-105.

65-3-202. Collection and disposition of fee.

The inspection, control and supervision fees provided for in this part shall be collected by the department of transportation. Such fees, when collected, shall be deposited in the state treasury but shall be kept in a separate account, to be known as the “railroad account,” and the funds so raised shall thus be segregated on a fiscal year basis. Effective June 30, 1996, the balance in the railroad account is to reflect all fees collected for the fiscal year and should reflect any payments authorized by this chapter for the fiscal year and each year thereafter. The same accounting procedures used by the department of finance and administration for the determination of other reserve fund balances for the department of transportation shall be applicable to the railroad account balance.

Acts 1970, ch. 599, § 1(6); T.C.A., § 65-333; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10; 1995, ch. 536, § 2.

65-3-203. Default.

In case of default in the payment of any such fee, or part thereof, when the same shall become due, as provided in this part, any railroad in default shall be liable to a penalty of ten percent (10%) per month on the amount of the fee, which may be recovered by suit of the state for every month it remains in default, and any such penalty, when collected, is to be deposited in the state treasury as part of the railroad account.

Acts 1970, ch. 599, § 1(7); T.C.A., § 65-334; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-204. Lien for fees and penalties.

A lien is declared and shall exist upon all the property of each railroad in default for the payment of the fee prescribed, together with all penalties accruing hereunder, which liens shall be superior to all other liens, except those for federal, state, county and municipal taxes.

Acts 1970, ch. 599, § 1(8); T.C.A., § 65-335; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-205. Employees.

The commissioner of transportation is empowered to employ such rate experts, engineers, attorneys, accountants, auditors, inspectors, examiners, clerks, agents or other employees, and assign to them such duties as shall be necessary to enable the department of transportation to fully perform the duties, and to exercise the powers conferred by this chapter upon the department of transportation, subject to its review. This section shall not be construed to authorize or to permit such attorneys to file any action or to otherwise appear before any state or federal court without prior approval of the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1970, ch. 599, § 1(19); T.C.A., § 65-336; Acts 1982, ch. 788, § 7; 1995, ch. 305, §§ 10, 13; 1995, ch. 536, § 3.

65-3-206. Railroads to file statements.

Every such railroad doing business in this state shall file with the department of transportation a statement under oath, in such form and substance as may be prescribed by the department of transportation, setting forth accurately the ton miles operated in the state, together with the total number of Tennessee main line miles for the preceding calendar year. Any such railroad failing to file such statement as required, or failing to give such other information as may be reasonably required of such railroad, commits a Class C misdemeanor for each day of such failure to comply.

Acts 1970, ch. 599, § 1(5); T.C.A., § 65-337; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

65-3-207. Use of fees.

The inspection, control and supervision fees generated by this part shall be used only to support railroad-related programs administered by the department of transportation and assessment functions performed by the comptroller of the treasury under title 67, chapter 5, part 13.

Acts 1998, ch. 787, § 1.